Tennessee, session 114, HB1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-33-206, is amended by deleting
subsection (b).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-33-205(a), is amended by
deleting the language "cost bond or".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to seizures occurring on or after that date.
HB1229
001591
- 1 -